ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.aff
SFX a N 309
SFX a   0     manta       .
SFX a   0     man         .
SFX a   0     paj         .
SFX a   0     taj         .
SFX a   0     pis         .
SFX a   0     ri          .
SFX a   0     má          .
SFX a   0     chá         .
SFX a   0     chu         .
SFX a   0     chus        .
SFX a   0     raj         .
SFX a   i     eqa         i
SFX a   u     oqa         u
SFX a   in    enqa        in
SFX a   un    onqa        un
SFX a   ir    erqa        ir
SFX a   ur    orqa        ur
SFX a   0     qa          [iu][^nr]
SFX a   0     qa          [^iu][nr]
SFX a   0     qa          [^iu][^nr]
SFX a   0     jina        .
SFX a   0     jinaqa      .
SFX a   0     wan         .
SFX a   0     puni        .
SFX a   0     ña          .
SFX a   0     sina        .
SFX a   0     pacha       .
SFX a   0     mantapacha  .
SFX a   0     kama        .
SFX a   0     rayku       .
SFX a   0     jawa        .
SFX a   0     pi          .
SFX a   0     mantachu    .
SFX a   0     manchu      .
SFX a   0     pajchu      .
SFX a   0     tajchu      .
SFX a   0     pischu      .
SFX a   0     richu       .
SFX a   0     rajchu      .
SFX a   i     eqachu      i
SFX a   u     oqachu      u
SFX a   in    enqachu     in
SFX a   un    onqachu     un
SFX a   ir    erqachu     ir
SFX a   ur    orqachu     ur
SFX a   0     qachu       [iu][^nr]
SFX a   0     qachu       [^iu][nr]
SFX a   0     qachu       [^iu][^nr]
SFX a   0     jinachu     .
SFX a   0     wanchu      .
SFX a   0     punichu     .
SFX a   0     ñachu       .
SFX a   0     sinachu     .
SFX a   0     pachachu    .
SFX a   0     mantapachachu .
SFX a   0     kamachu     .
SFX a   0     raykuchu    .
SFX a   0     jawachu     .
SFX a   0     pichu       .
SFX a   0     mantachá    .
SFX a   0     manchá      .
SFX a   0     pajchá      .
SFX a   0     tajchá      .
SFX a   0     pischá      .
SFX a   0     richá       .
SFX a   0     rajchá      .
SFX a   i     eqachá      i
SFX a   u     oqachá      u
SFX a   in    enqachá     in
SFX a   un    onqachá     un
SFX a   ir    erqachá     ir
SFX a   ur    orqachá     ur
SFX a   0     qachá       [iu][^nr]
SFX a   0     qachá       [^iu][nr]
SFX a   0     qachá       [^iu][^nr]
SFX a   0     jinachá     .
SFX a   0     wanchá      .
SFX a   0     punichá     .
SFX a   0     ñachá       .
SFX a   0     sinachá     .
SFX a   0     pachachá    .
SFX a   0     mantapachachá .
SFX a   0     kamachá     .
SFX a   0     raykuchá    .
SFX a   0     jawachá     .
SFX a   0     pichá       .
SFX a   0     mantachus   .
SFX a   0     manchus     .
SFX a   0     pajchus     .
SFX a   0     tajchus     .
SFX a   0     pischus     .
SFX a   0     richus      .
SFX a   0     rajchus     .
SFX a   i     eqachus     i
SFX a   u     oqachus     u
SFX a   in    enqachus    in
SFX a   un    onqachus    un
SFX a   ir    erqachus    ir
SFX a   ur    orqachus    ur
SFX a   0     qachus      [iu][^nr]
SFX a   0     qachus      [^iu][nr]
SFX a   0     qachus      [^iu][^nr]
SFX a   0     jinachus    .
SFX a   0     wanchus     .
SFX a   0     punichus    .
SFX a   0     ñachus      .
SFX a   0     sinachus    .
SFX a   0     pachachus   .
SFX a   0     mantapachachus .
SFX a   0     kamachus    .
SFX a   0     raykuchus   .
SFX a   0     jawachus    .
SFX a   0     pichus      .
SFX a   0     mantapaj    .
SFX a   0     manpaj      .
SFX a   0     pajtaj      .
SFX a   0     pajpis      .
SFX a   0     pajri       .
SFX a   0     pajmá       .
SFX a   0     pajraj      .
SFX a   0     pajqa       .
SFX a   0     jinapaj     .
SFX a   0     wanpaj      .
SFX a   0     pajpuni     .
SFX a   0     ñapaj       .
SFX a   0     sinapaj     .
SFX a   0     pachapaj    .
SFX a   0     mantapachapaj .
SFX a   0     kamapaj     .
SFX a   0     raykupaj    .
SFX a   0     jawapaj     .
SFX a   0     pipaj       .
SFX a   0     mantajina   .
SFX a   0     manjina     .
SFX a   0     jinataj     .
SFX a   0     jinapis     .
SFX a   0     jinari      .
SFX a   0     jinamá      .
SFX a   0     jinaraj     .
SFX a   0     jinaqa      .
SFX a   0     jinawan     .
SFX a   0     jinapuni    .
SFX a   0     jinaña      .
SFX a   0     jinasina    .
SFX a   0     pachajina   .
SFX a   0     mantapachajina .
SFX a   0     kamajina    .
SFX a   0     raykujina   .
SFX a   0     jinajawa    .
SFX a   0     pijina      .
SFX a   0     pimanta     .
SFX a   0     piman       .
SFX a   0     pitaj       .
SFX a   0     pipis       .
SFX a   0     piri        .
SFX a   0     pimá        .
SFX a   0     piraj       .
SFX a   0     piqa        .
SFX a   0     piwan       .
SFX a   0     pipuni      .
SFX a   0     piña        .
SFX a   0     pisina      .
SFX a   0     pachapi     .
SFX a   0     mantapachapi .
SFX a   0     pikama      .
SFX a   0     pirayku     .
SFX a   0     pijawa      .
SFX a   0     mantapis    .
SFX a   0     manpis      .
SFX a   0     tajpis      .
SFX a   0     pisri       .
SFX a   0     pismá       .
SFX a   0     rajpis      .
SFX a   0     pisqa       .
SFX a   0     wanpis      .
SFX a   0     pispuni     .
SFX a   0     ñapis       .
SFX a   0     sinapis     .
SFX a   0     pachapis    .
SFX a   0     mantapachapis .
SFX a   0     kamapis     .
SFX a   0     raykupis    .
SFX a   0     jawapis     .
SFX a   0     jpis        [aeo]
SFX a   i     ejpis       i
SFX a   u     ojpis       u
SFX a   0     jpapis      [aeo]
SFX a   i     ejpapis     i
SFX a   u     ojpapis     u
SFX a   0     jtapis      [aeo]
SFX a   i     ejtapis     i
SFX a   u     ojtapis     u
SFX a   0     jpatapis    [aeo]
SFX a   i     ejpatapis   i
SFX a   u     ojpatapis   u
SFX a   0     papis       [^aeiou]
SFX a   0     patapis     [^aeiou]
SFX a   0     mantawan    .
SFX a   0     manwan      .
SFX a   0     wantaj      .
SFX a   0     wanri       .
SFX a   0     wanmá       .
SFX a   0     rajwan      .
SFX a   0     wanqa       .
SFX a   0     wanpuni     .
SFX a   0     ñawan       .
SFX a   0     sinawan     .
SFX a   0     pachawan    .
SFX a   0     mantapachawan .
SFX a   0     kamawan     .
SFX a   0     raykuwan    .
SFX a   0     jawawan     .
SFX a   0     mantataj    .
SFX a   0     mantaj      .
SFX a   0     tajri       .
SFX a   0     tajmá       .
SFX a   0     rajtaj      .
SFX a   0     tajqa       .
SFX a   0     tajpuni     .
SFX a   0     ñataj       .
SFX a   0     sinataj     .
SFX a   0     pachataj    .
SFX a   0     mantapachataj .
SFX a   0     kamataj     .
SFX a   0     raykutaj    .
SFX a   0     jawataj     .
SFX a   0     mantari     .
SFX a   0     manri       .
SFX a   0     rimá        .
SFX a   0     rajri       .
SFX a   0     riqa        .
SFX a   0     ripuni      .
SFX a   0     ñari        .
SFX a   0     sinari      .
SFX a   0     pachari     .
SFX a   0     mantapachari .
SFX a   0     kamari      .
SFX a   0     raykuri     .
SFX a   0     jawari      .
SFX a   0     mantaqa     .
SFX a   0     manqa       .
SFX a   0     qamá        .
SFX a   0     rajqa       .
SFX a   0     puniqa      .
SFX a   0     ñaqa        .
SFX a   0     sinaqa      .
SFX a   0     pachaqa     .
SFX a   0     mantapachaqa .
SFX a   0     kamaqa      .
SFX a   0     raykuqa     .
SFX a   0     jawaqa      .
SFX a   0     mantarayku  .
SFX a   0     manrayku    .
SFX a   0     raykumá     .
SFX a   0     raykuraj    .
SFX a   0     raykupuni   .
SFX a   0     raykuña     .
SFX a   0     raykusina   .
SFX a   0     pacharayku  .
SFX a   0     mantapacharayku .
SFX a   0     kamarayku   .
SFX a   0     raykujawa   .
SFX a   0     mantapuni   .
SFX a   0     manpuni     .
SFX a   0     punimá      .
SFX a   0     rajpuni     .
SFX a   0     ñapuni      .
SFX a   0     punisina    .
SFX a   0     pachapuni   .
SFX a   0     mantapachapuni .
SFX a   0     kamapuni    .
SFX a   0     punijawa    .
SFX a   0     mantaña     .
SFX a   0     manña       .
SFX a   0     ñamá        .
SFX a   0     ñaraj       .
SFX a   0     ñasina      .
SFX a   0     pachaña     .
SFX a   0     mantapachaña .
