ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.dic
Ana/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Augusto/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Blas/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Calientes/atghlmwjk
Chachani/atghlmwjk
Chive/atghlmwjk
Coulomb/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Escobar/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Filadelfia/atghlmwjk
Gregorio/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Huascaran/atghlmwjk
Isidoro/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Juliaca/atghlmwjk
Lanchi/atghlmwjk
MRTK/atghlmwjk
Marta/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Montero/atghlmwjk
Ollagüe/atghlmwjk
Parana/atghlmwjk
Piura/atghlmwjk
Puna/atghlmwjk
Quispe/aAtTgGhHylmMwWoOnNpP
Rusariw/atghlmwjk
Sillustani/atghlmwjk
Tiawanaku/atghlmwjk
Tunpalla/atghlmwjk
Uyuni/atghlmwjk
Wallpa/atghlmwjk
Yampara/atghlmwjk
achiwiti/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
akupalla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
amarumayu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
anpi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
apannika/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
aqochinchay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
asijtullu/aAtTlwW
atimusoy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
awqaruna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ayna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
añayñojñu/aAtTlwW
ch'amaka/aAtTlwW
ch'aspa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'illpi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'iñichallwa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'unqana/aAtTlwW
ch'uwasunqo/aAtTlwW
chajwa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chanka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chaskina/aAtTlwW
chhaku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chhichiqori/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chijmu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chiqachiqalla/aAtT
chojchasapa/aAtTlwW
chullusqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
churana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ikumi/aAtTlwW
intichillay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
iskaychunka/aAtTlwW
iñina/aAtTlwW
jamillu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
janqakay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jarqalla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jawchakay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jaytara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jirku/aAtTlwW
juk'uta/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jusk'usapa/aAtTlwW
k'aray/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'iki/aAtTlwW
k'iski/aAtTlwW
k'uma/aAtTlwW
kachapu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kaphia/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khachu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khuturu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kiwapanpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kusikawsay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llakiy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llast'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
lluna/aAtTlwW
maji/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mantur/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mayt'u/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
misk'irimaj/aAtTlwW
murmi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
nuq'achasqa/aAtTlwW
p'iqeña/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pajpaka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
parirojru/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
phichiqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pillkuranpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pullkanka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'achaq'acha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'elluchi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'oñijallp'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qarpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qewña/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qhatipa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qhorqoj/aAtTlwW
qoqoma/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ranran/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
rukupa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sajsasajsa/aAtTlwW
sapsi/aAtTlwW
sijllakay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sipaskay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
siwina/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sunqochinkay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'ajta/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'ipasqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
taka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tawachaki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tiana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tojtuka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tuytu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
unqena/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
uruya/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wach'oj/aAtTlwW
wak'aruna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wankha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wari/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
watmu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
waywara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wirawira/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
yanki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
yurajsijmi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ñojch'u/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
